Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 2. Premiums and Rates
§ 27-14-203.
Failure of employer to make payments; interest; lien; injunction; nonexclusive remedies.

Any employer not applying for coverage of eligible employees or, after obtaining coverage under this act, any employer failing, neglecting or refusing to make payments required by this act within thirty (30) days of the date due and against whom any injured employee is held entitled to worker’s compensation benefits is liable to the state for an amount equal to all awards, both paid and reserved entered for payment to or for the employee under this act. If the employer fails, neglects or refuses to satisfy his liability within the thirty (30) day period, the amount may be recovered by civil action in the name of the director. The entry of final order by the division or hearing examiner approving and allowing an award of compensation is prima facie proof of the liability of an employer failing to comply with this act.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 176, § 2.

Premiums not paid on or before the date due shall bear interest of one percent (1%) per month or any fractional portion thereof from the due date until payment plus accrued interest is received by the division. The interest is part of the payment due for all purposes if suit is instituted as provided in this act.

If premiums, liabilities pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, interest and penalties provided by this section are not paid within thirty (30) days of the date due and following notice by the division to the employer of the remedies authorized under this section, and the consequences of these remedies the attorney general may bring suit in the name of the state for the collection of all delinquent payments, liabilities pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, interest and penalties. If a judgment is rendered in favor of the state, the judgment shall be for the amount of the premiums, liabilities pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, interest and penalties together with costs.

If payments under this act are not paid on or before the date due and following notice under subsection (d) of this section, the director may file a lien with the county clerk of the county in which the employer has his principal place of business and a copy with any other county. The amount due is a lien upon all real and personal property of the employer and is in effect from the time of filing and covers all property of the employer in any county in which filed. The director shall file notice of satisfaction of the lien with the county clerk if payments are collected or found erroneous and may release any property from the lien or subordinate the lien if he determines payments are secured by a lien on other property or the collection of payments are not in jeopardy.

Any employer employing any person in any covered employment who, following notice by the division of the remedies authorized under this section, fails to apply for coverage under this act or, after obtaining coverage under this act, fails to make payments within thirty (30) days of the date due, may be enjoined in an action instituted by the director from engaging or continuing in a business covered by this act. Operations may, in whole or in part, be enjoined until required payments are made and the employer complies with this act. The director is not required to give bond in the action.

Remedies provided by this act are cumulative and are not exclusive.

If judgment is rendered in favor of the employer in any action under this section, he shall be entitled to recover all his costs including a reasonable attorney’s fee from the division. This recovery shall not affect the employer’s experience rating.

The division may enter into an installment payment agreement with a delinquent employer where payment in a lump sum would cause severe inconvenience to the employer, provided that:

The agreement shall be agreed upon within thirty (30) days of the notice provided pursuant to subsection (d) of this section;

The term of the installment payment agreement shall not exceed twelve (12) months; and

Prospective liabilities which are reasonably expected to accrue during the term of the installment payment agreement may be included in the installment payment agreement.

No additional interest, penalties or other liabilities authorized under this section shall accrue to the employer for the employer’s delinquencies if the employer has entered into an installment payment agreement pursuant to subsection (j) of this section and is in compliance with the terms of the agreement. The employer’s relief from liability provided pursuant to W.S. 27-14-104(a) shall remain in effect while the employer is in compliance with the agreement, provided that the employer has no further delinquencies under this section. If an employer fails to comply with the terms of its installment payment agreement, all premiums, liabilities pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, interest and penalties provided by this section shall be applied as of the original delinquency date minus any payments made and the division may exercise any remaining remedies authorized under this act.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1993, ch. 176, § 2; 1995, ch. 205, § 1; 2006, ch. 2, § 1; 2007, ch. 195, § 1; 2017 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to punishment for an employer who makes a false statement in his or her payroll report, see §

27-14-510

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, deleted “or fifty dollars ($50.00) per month, whichever amount is greater” in (c).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “both paid and reserved” in (a); in (d), inserted variations of “liabilities pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, interests and penalties provided by this section” twice, and inserted “all.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “the amount may be recovered” for “the amount shall be recovered”; in (c), substituted “one percent (1%)” for “two percent (2%)”; in (d), substituted “the attorney general may bring suit” for “the attorney general shall immediately bring suit” and “the judgment shall be for the amount of the premiums, liabilities pursuant to subsection (a) of this sections, interest and penalties” for “the judgment shall be for double the amount of the payroll payment provided by this act”; in (f), substituted “may be enjoined in an action” for “shall be enjoined in an action” and “operations may, in whole or in part, be enjoined” for “operations shall be enjoined”; and added (j) and (k).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Cited

in

Kunkle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 49, 109 P.3d 887,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(2005).

Quoted in

State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 111, 384 P.3d 267,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort liability of worker's compensation insurer for wrongful delay or refusal to make payments due, 8 ALR4th 902.

§ 27-14-204.
Coverage of out-of-state injuries; filing.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 177, § 2.

The payment or award of benefits under the worker’s compensation law of another state to an employee or his dependents otherwise entitled on account of the injury or death to the benefits of this act is not a bar to a claim for benefits under this act if a claim under this act is filed within the time limits set forth in W.S.

27-14-503

. If compensation is paid or awarded under this act, the total amounts of medical and related income and death benefits paid or awarded under another worker’s compensation law shall be credited against the total corresponding medical and related income and death benefits due under this act.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2.

Any employee injured outside of the state of Wyoming and coming under the provisions of this section shall file his application for compensation with the division.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 79, § 1; 1993, ch. 113, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 177, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Notice. —

The plaintiff had sufficient notice that the workers' compensation division would rely upon the provisions of subsection (a) of this section where although the division did not specifically cite this section, the language of the determinations was sufficiently similar to the statutory language of subsection (a) to put the plaintiff on notice of the provision as in issue and the parties actions at the hearing, i.e. counsel for both parties focused on whether the plaintiff was a Wyoming employee, was indicative that the plaintiff had notice that the plaintiff's right to extraterritorial benefits pursuant to subsection (a) would be at issue. Gneiting v. State ex rel. State Workers' Compensation Div., 897 P.2d 1306,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1995).

Evidence. —

The worker's compensation division showed by a preponderance of the evidence that an employee was permanently assigned outside of the state. B-F Drilling v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 942 P.2d 392,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1997).

Estoppel. —

The worker's compensation division was not estopped from denying coverage for an employee's injury by afterwards accepting premium payments for the employee. B-F Drilling v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 942 P.2d 392,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Wessel v. Mapco, Inc., 752 P.2d 1363,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 27-14-205.
State contributions; presumed pay of specified employees.

State agencies shall administer this act as an employer with respect to its employees including filing payroll reports and submitting premium payments for those employees engaged in extrahazardous employment and covered under this act. Each state agency having officers or employees subject to this act shall file payroll reports and submit premium payments as required by this act. Premium payments for coverage of any employee employed under a federally funded program administered by an agency may be made from available federal funds.

For the purpose of determining employer contributions under this act, all school-to-work participants for which coverage has been elected under W.S. 27-14-108(m), all persons receiving training under any work or job training program for which coverage has been elected under W.S. 27-14-108(p), all volunteers covered under this act, mine rescue team members, recipients of any welfare program performing work for a governmental entity, federal programs which require coverage for their participants, prisoners and probationers under W.S. 27-14-108(d)(ix) and persons performing community service pursuant to a criminal sentencing order, or a diversion agreement entered into with a prosecuting authority, under W.S. 27-14-108(d)(xv), are deemed to be paid for each month of active service, an amount established by rule and regulation of the division based upon the cost of the specific employment category to the worker’s compensation account. This amount shall be established solely as a basis for determining employer contributions and is not binding upon any employer as an actual required salary for any volunteer or other individual enumerated under this subsection.

For purposes of determining employer contributions under this act for officers of a corporation or members of a limited liability company electing coverage under W.S. 27-14-108(k), rates shall be applied for each officer or member covered under this act against the statewide average wage for the preceding twelve (12) month period as determined under W.S. 27-14-802(b).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a school district or community college district may make payroll reports and payments on behalf of any employer electing coverage for school-to-work participants under W.S. 27-14-108(m). If a school or community college district elects to make payments under this subsection, the district shall continue to make reports and payments for the duration of participation by the school-to-work participant with that employer.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1987, ch. 94, § 1; 1989, ch. 161, § 1; ch. 226, § 1; 1990, ch. 25, § 1; 1993, ch. 122, § 1; ch. 216, § 1; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 93, § 1; 1999, ch. 46, § 1; 2000, ch. 32, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 10, § 1; 2018 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

in (b), deleted the last sentence, which read: “The division shall report any anticipated deficiencies in contributions due to this subsection to the legislature on or before January 15 of each year.”

Laws 2018, ch. 29, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

§ 27-14-206.
Public contract work; coverage procedure; responsibility on private contracts.

If the state, county, University of Wyoming, community college district, school district, special district or municipality engages in work in which employees are employed for wages and if the work is being done by contract, the payroll of the prime or general contractor or subcontractor shall be the basis of computation for the payroll assessment. The required payments shall be subject to the provisions of this act and the state, the county, university, community college district, school district, special district or municipality, shall be entitled to collect from the prime or general contractor the full amount payable under this act unless the subcontractor primarily liable for the payment of premiums has paid the premiums as provided for in this act.

The prime or general contractor shall secure certification when a contract is awarded or before permitting a subcontractor to begin work, that the subcontractor has in good standing an account under this act that covers all coverable employees in the employ of the subcontractor.

The state, county, university, community college district, school district, special district or municipality shall secure certification before allowing a prime or general contractor to permit coverable employees to start work on a contract, that the contractor, prime or general, has in good standing an account under this act that covers employees who are subject to this act.

Before final settlement is made by the state, county, university, community college district, school district, special district or municipality, the contractor shall furnish evidence that all obligations for covered employees on the contract have been paid as provided by this act.

In private work a contractor who subcontracts all or any part of a contract is liable for the payment of worker’s compensation premiums for the employees of the subcontractor unless the subcontractor primarily liable for the payment of premiums has paid the premiums as provided for in this act. Any contractor or his carrier who becomes liable for the premiums may recover the amount of the premiums paid and necessary expenses from the subcontractor primarily liable therefor. For premiums paid on behalf of the employees of any subcontractor pursuant to this subsection, the contractor shall be afforded all privileges and immunities under this act as if he were the employer of the subcontractor’s employees.

The owner or lessee of land shall be deemed a contractor when he contracts with another who shall be deemed a subcontractor to have work performed of a kind which is a regular or recurrent part of the work of the trade, business, occupation or profession of the owner or lessee. This subsection shall not apply to the owner or lessee of land principally used for agriculture.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Effect of property owner being employer. —

The question of whether a property owner is an employer within the meaning of the Worker's Compensation Law is one of law. If an owner of a project is an employer, the employee's sole remedy is worker's compensation and the employee may not subject the owner to a common-law tort action. On the other hand, if the owner is a third party, he is subject to a common-law tort action for the injuries sustained by the contractor's employee. Bence v. Pacific Power & Light Co., 631 P.2d 13,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1981).

Stated

in

Stratman v. Admiral Beverage Corp., 760 P.2d 974,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 27-14-207.
Employer registration required; person acquiring trade of another employer; transfer of experience and assignment of rates; out of state employers.

Any employer subject to this act shall not commence business or engage in work in this state without applying for coverage under this act and receiving a statement of coverage from the division.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person acquiring the trade, organization, business or substantially all of the assets of an employer subject to this act shall assume the previous employer’s account, experience rating and premium rate as assigned by the division, provided the previous employer is not participating in the premium deductible program under W.S. 27-14-201(t). If the previous employer is participating in the premium deductible program, the acquiring person shall assume the previous employer’s account, experience rating and premium rate as determined without premium deductible program eligibility. The acquiring person shall assume the premium rate which is in effect at the time of the acquisition based on the existing account’s classification, experience rating and any surcharge which may apply, as determined without premium deductible program eligibility.

A person acquiring the trade, organization, business or substantially all of the assets of any employer subject to this act whose owners or shareholders have not held an ownership interest in the employer being acquired within one (1) year previous to the date of acquisition shall assume the previous employer’s account number, experience rating and premium rate as assigned by the division, provided the previous employer is not participating in the premium deductible program under W.S. 27-14-201(t). If the previous employer is participating in the premium deductible program, the acquiring person shall assume the previous employer’s account, experience rating and premium rate as determined without premium deductible program eligibility.

The transfer of some or all of an employer’s workforce to another person shall be considered a transfer of trade or business when, as a result of the transfer, the transferring employer no longer performs trade or business with respect to the transferred workforce, and the trade or business is performed by the person to whom the workforce is transferred.

If an employer transfers all or a portion of its trade or business to another employer and, at the time of the transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management or control of the two (2) employers, then the workers’ compensation experience attributable to the transferred trade or business shall be transferred to the employer to whom the business is transferred. The rates of both employers shall be recalculated and made effective the first day of the calendar quarter immediately following the date of the transfer of trade or business.

If, following a transfer of experience under this section, the department determines that a substantial purpose of the transfer of the trade or business was to obtain a reduced premium liability, then the accounts of the employers involved shall be combined into a single account.

If a person is not an employer under this section at the time the person acquires the trade or business of an employer, the workers’ compensation experience of the acquired employer shall not be transferred to the person if the department finds that the person acquired the trade or business of the employer solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower premium rate. Instead, the person shall be assigned the applicable industry base rate in effect at the time of the acquisition. In determining whether the trade or business was acquired solely or primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower premium rate, the department shall use objective factors which may include the cost of acquiring the business, whether the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired business, how long the business enterprise was continued, or whether a substantial number of new employees were hired for performance of duties unrelated to the business activity conducted prior to acquisition.

Where an employer has not had prior operations in Wyoming and has not had prior worker’s compensation insurance coverage in Wyoming, and moves or expands operations from another state into Wyoming, and begins operations that are the same or similar to operations outside of Wyoming, the division shall assign the employer experience modification rate as calculated per the current experience modification rating formula in place at the time. The division shall assign such experience modification to the partial year ending June 30 after the start of coverage in Wyoming and to the first full policy year subsequent to the start of coverage in Wyoming.

The division by rule and regulation shall establish procedures to identify the transfer or acquisition of a business, or the movement of an out of state operation to Wyoming, for purposes of this section and W.S.

27-14-806

. The division may require by regulation an out of state employer to submit any information necessary for the purpose of determining an experience modification rate under subsection (h) of this section.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 121, § 1; 1999, ch. 114, § 1; 2003, ch. 185, § 1; 2005, ch. 185, § 2; 2017 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), thrice substituted “person” for “employer”, and substituted “assume the premium rate” for “make contributions at the premium rate”; in (c), twice substituted “person” for “employer”; and added (d) through (h).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (h); redesignated former (h) as (j); in (j), added “or the movement of an out of state operation to Wyoming” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.